Maryland, session 2025, HB1470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–1815.1.
(a) (1) The provisions of this section are in addition to any other sanction,
remedy, or penalty provided by law.
(2) This section does not apply to any cutting or clearing of trees that is
allowed under regulations adopted by the Commission under this subtitle.
(b) [If] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, IF a person cuts or
clears or plans to cut or clear trees within the Chesapeake Bay Critical Area or Atlantic
Coastal Bays Critical Area in violation of an approved local critical area program or of
regulations adopted by the Commission, the chair may bring an action, or the local
jurisdiction may bring an action or request that the chair of the Commission refer the
matter to the Attorney General to bring an action:
(1) To require the person to replant trees where the cutting or clearing
occurred in accordance with a plan prepared by the State Forester, a registered professional
forester, or a registered landscape architect;
(2) To restrain the planned violation; or
(3) For damages:
(i) To be assessed by a circuit court in an amount equal to the
estimated cost of replanting trees; and

HOUSE BILL 1470 3
(ii) To be paid to the Department by the person found to have
violated the provisions of this subsection.
(c) If the chair of the Commission has reason to believe that the local jurisdiction
is failing to enforce the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, the chair shall refer
the matter to the Attorney General as provided under § 8–1815(b) of this subtitle.
(d) On the chair of the Commission’s referral of an alleged violation under
subsection (c) of this section to the Attorney General, the Attorney General may invoke the
remedies available to the local jurisdiction under subsection (b) of this section in any court
of competent jurisdiction in which the local jurisdiction would be authorized to prosecute
or sue.
(e) On the request of a local jurisdiction or the chair of the Commission, the State
Forester, a registered professional forester, or a registered landscape architect may
prepare, oversee, and approve the final implementation of a plan to:
(1) Replant trees in any part of the Chesapeake Bay Critical Area where
trees in the Chesapeake Bay Critical Area are cut or cleared in violation of subsection (b)
of this section; and
(2) Replant trees in any part of the Atlantic Coastal Bays Critical Area
where trees in the Atlantic Coastal Bays Critical Area are cut or cleared in violation of
subsection (b) of this section.
(F) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY IN:
(I) IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY; AND
(II) TO REAL PROPERTY CONSISTING OF A PARCEL OF LAND OF
LESS THAN 5 ACRES THAT IS NOT ZONED FOR COMMERCIAL USE.
(2) A PERSON WHO IN GOOD FAITH PURCHASES PROPERTY IN THE
CRITICAL AREA MAY NOT BE HELD LIABLE FOR THE CUTTING OR CLEARING OF
TREES BY PREVIOUS OWNERS OR USERS OF THE PROPERTY IN VIOLATION OF
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS AUTHORIZING A
PERSON TO APPEAL AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) IN THE ENFORCEMENT OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION FOR A VIOLATION INVOLVING THE CLEARING OR CUTTING OF TREES IN THE
CRITICAL AREA, THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY DEPARTMENT OF PERMITTING,
INSPECTIONS, AND ENFORCEMENT SHALL RECORD A LIEN ON THE PROPERTY THAT

HOUSE BILL 1470
IS THE SUBJECT OF THE VIOLATION WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER ISSUING NOTICE OF THE
VIOLATION TO THE PROPERTY OWNER.
(II) A PROPERLY RECORDED LIEN AS DESCRIBED IN
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS REQUIRED TO ENFORCE AND HOLD A
CURRENT PROPERTY OWNER LIABLE FOR THE CUTTING OR CLEARING OF TREES BY
A PREVIOUS PROPERTY OWNER OR USER WHO PERFORMED THE ACT THAT CAUSED
THE VIOLATION.
(III) IF A LIEN IS NOT RECORDED AS REQUIRED, THE LOCAL
JURISDICTION:
1. MAY PURSUE AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION AGAINST
ONLY THE PREVIOUS OWNER OR USER THAT PERFORMED THE ACT THAT CAUSED
THE VIOLATION;
2. MAY NOT SEEK THE REMEDIES DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION AGAINST THE CURRENT PROPERTY OWNER; AND
3. A. SHALL PERFORM ANY RESTORATION OR
MITIGATION THAT MAY BE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION OR § 8–1815 OF THIS
SUBTITLE RESULTING FROM THE VIOLATION THAT IS NOT PERFORMED BY THE
PREVIOUS OWNER OR USER; AND
B. MAY ENTER THE PROPERTY THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF
THE VIOLATION FOR RESTORATION OR MITIGATION PURPOSES IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 8–1815 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) This Act shall be construed to apply retroactively and shall be applied to and
interpreted to affect a violation of § 8–1815(b) described in § 8–1815.1(b) of the Natural
Resources Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, in Prince George’s County occurring
on or before November 7, 2018, but only with respect to a violation imposed on a current
property owner who in good faith purchases the property that is the subject of the violation
after a previous property owner or user committed the act that caused the violation and
was cited for the violation.
(b) The Prince George’s County government and the Maryland–National Capital
Park and Planning Commission shall vacate any administrative enforcement actions taken
for a violation described in subsection (a) of this section, including the release of a lien
recorded on the property that is the subject of the violation.
(c) The Prince George’s County government shall reimburse a current property
owner for all costs and fees associated with any administrative enforcement actions taken

HOUSE BILL 1470 5
for a violation described in subsection (a) of this section, including civil penalties, bonds,
reforestation costs, fees for attorneys, engineers, foresters, and landscape architects, and
any other costs or fees.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of September
30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.